Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
Article 1A Promotion of Agricultural Commodities

2-8-5.
Definitions.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Agricultural commodities” means any and all agricultural, horticultural, floricultural, and vegetable products produced in this state or any class, variety, or utilization thereof, either in their natural state or as processed by a producer for the purpose of marketing such product or by a processor, and shall include any one, any combination thereof, or all of the agricultural products, livestock and livestock products, poultry and poultry products, timber and timber products, fish and seafood, and the products of the farms and forests of this state.

“Processor” has the meaning provided by Code Section 2-8-11.

“Producer” has the meaning provided by Code Section 2-8-11.

The Commissioner shall be authorized to take all actions necessary and appropriate to create, register, license, promote, and protect a trademark for use in connection with the general promotion of agricultural commodities as being Georgia grown.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 446, § 3/SB 152.